Home
Apps
About
FAQ
Contact
GLOBAL PRIVACY POLICY
Effective Date: February 6, 2024
Contents
Who We Are
Introduction
Defined Terms
How We Collect Data
Types of Data We Collect
Why We Use and Process Data
Who We Share Data with and Why
Your Choices About Our Use of Data
How Long We Use and Store PII
How We Protect Data
Opt-Out Preferences
Persons Outside the United States, EU, EEA, UK and Switzerland
Contact Us
Updates to this Privacy Policy
Addendum for Persons Residing in California
Addendum for Persons Located in the European Union, EEA, UK and Switzerland
1. Who We Are
We are located at 23801 Calabasas Road, Calabasas, CA 91302, USA. Along with our affiliates (collectively, “
Company Group
”, or “
we/our/us
”), we own and operate a number of websites (the “
Websites
” or “
Sites
”) and mobile applications (the “
Apps
”).
This global Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) applies to each Website and App that it appears on.
2. Introduction
This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use, process, share and store Data when you use our Services (both terms as defined below), explains rights that you may have under specific data privacy and protection laws, and provides instructions on how to exercise any rights that apply to you (collectively, “
Data Laws
”).
The rights discussed in the CCPA Notice are for residents of California. The rights discussed in the GDPR Notice are for persons located in the EU, EEA, UK or Switzerland. Depending on where you live or are located, these rights may not apply to you. Both the CCPA Notice and the GDPR Notice are provided as Addenda at the end of this Privacy Policy.
Our Websites, Apps and Services may include links to third-party websites, plug-ins, services, social networks or mobile applications. Clicking on those links, or enabling those connections, may allow the third-party to collect or share Data about you. We do not control these third parties, and you should read each of their privacy notices
before
you submit any information to them.
Paypal Notices
PayPal is an independent Controller for the purpose of Processing Customer Data. You can access Paypal’s Privacy Statement at:
https://www.paypal.com/us/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full
You should carefully read this document to understand our policies and practices for processing and storing Data. By interacting with our Services, you accept the policies and practices described in this Privacy Policy. This Privacy Policy may change from time to time (see
Updates to This Privacy Policy
), and your continued use of our Services after any change means you accept those changes. Please check the Privacy Policy frequently for any updates.
3. Defined Terms
In addition to the terms already defined above, we provide these definitions:
“
CCPA
” means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as it may be amended from time to time.
“
Data
” is information about you that we collect, or that you provide to us, and may include PII.
“
Device
” means the computer, smart phone or other electronic device that you use to access the Services.
“
Device Information
” means information about a Device, including the IP address used to access the Services, associated cookies or cookie identifiers, and other information related to the formatting or presentation of the Services for your Device and includes information about the Device often stored in picture files, including Device type and the location you were in when you took the picture.
“
EEA
” means countries in the EU plus Iceland, Lichtenstein, and Norway.
“
EU
” means the countries which are currently members of the European Union.
“
GDPR
” means the General Data Protection Regulation of the European Union, and the equivalent Data laws of the EEA, United Kingdom and Switzerland.
“
Identifiable Natural Person
” is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, by a single piece of data such as a name, an ID number, IP address, location data, an online identifier or by other data that, when combined, makes it possible to determine the identity of that natural person.
“
Personal Data
” means any information about an identified or Identifiable Natural Person who has rights under the GDPR (“
Data Subject
”).
“
Personal Information
” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer, household or Device.
“
PII
” means personally identifiable information, which is information that can be used to identify a specific individual, including Data that may be classified as Personal Information subject to the CCPA Notice or Personal Data subject to the GDPR Notice.
“
Services
” means the Sites, Apps, and other services available from us.
4. How We Collect Data
We use different methods to collect Data, including:
Direct Interactions
. These direct interactions include the contents of your communications with us, whether via e-mail, chat functionality, social media, telephone or otherwise, and inferences we may make from other personal information we collect. Where permitted by applicable law, we may collect and maintain records of calls and chats with our agents, representatives, or employees via message, chat, post, or similar functionality. Our chatbox vendors may also retain records of your chats with us.
Additionally, data from direct interactions may be collected through third parties that have their own privacy policies and procedures regarding the collection and processing of your data. When using the ChatGPT functionality on the Sites, you consent to our collection of and the transfer and processing of the data you provide in the chat, to ChatGPT.
These interactions also include data you provide when you create an account, subscribe to our Services, search for a product, place an order, upload a photo or other content, create a seller profile on our Services that offer seller capabilities, participate in discussion boards or other social media functions on our Services, enter a competition, promotion or survey, and when you report a problem with our Services. If you choose to make any seller profile that you create public, people may see your name, the country you designate in your profile, and your “About” details. You can adjust the privacy settings for your seller profile at any time.
Automated Technologies or Interactions
. As you interact with our Services, we may automatically collect Data about your Device and your browsing actions and patterns, even if you do not create an account or place an order with us. We collect this Data by using cookies, server logs, and other similar technologies. You can block cookies in your browser by activating the settings that allow you to refuse all or some cookies.
IMPORTANT NOTE: if you use your browser settings to block all cookies (including essential cookies), the Services may not function properly or may not work at all
.
Cross-Device Tracking
: Some of our Services use data analytics companies, advertising networks, and/or social media companies to engage in “cross-Device tracking,” which occurs when platforms, publishers, and advertising technology companies try to connect a consumer’s activity across smartphones, tablets, desktop computers, and other connected devices. Cross-Device tracking enables us to link your behavior with our Services across Devices.
Third parties or Publicly Available Sources
. We receive Data from third parties such as business partners and sub-contractors who provide us with a variety of business services like shipping and payment processing, advertising, analytics, search information, etc.
User Contributions
. You may also provide us with Data to post on the Services or to transmit to third parties (collectively, "User Contributions"). User Contributions are submitted at your own risk. We limit access to certain pages, and you can also adjust privacy settings for User Contributions by logging into your account profile. However, we cannot and do not guarantee that unauthorized persons will not be able to view your User Contributions.
5. Types of Data We Collect
PII We Collect
We collect PII including your name, billing address, delivery address, e-mail address, telephone number, IP address, credit/debit card numbers and other financial information needed to complete your transactions with us, photos and other content you upload, any profile image you provide, user IDs and/or passwords used to access the Services, your Services browsing history, and any phone number used to call our customer service number. Depending on the Services you use and the products you choose to customize, you may also provide us with video and voice recordings, age, date of birth, gender and other similar information. If you sell products through our Services, in addition to the information above we collect information necessary to pay you and comply with tax reporting laws, such as your PayPal account, and social security or Tax ID number, and your birthdate for verification of your identity. Each piece of information you give us may be used independently or in conjunction with other information you provide to us.
Device Information
We collect information relating to the Device(s) you use to access the Services, including the Device model, operating system, browser type, IP address, and event information from use of the Services.
Mobile App
Depending on your permissions, if you download and use our Apps, we may collect or access certain information from your mobile Device including:
Your contacts so you can select a chosen contact to ship your order to. Once you select a contact from your mobile Device, that contact’s information will be stored in our database and their postal address and phone will be used for delivery of your order and for sending you reminders of special occasions that you recorded in the Services; and
Your phone number, entered by you in response to our request and stored in your account data, as required for shipping in some countries and for retail pickup orders in countries where that option is provided.
Community Postings
You can post information on our blogs, forums, or other public posting areas. Any information you disclose is available to anyone with internet access. You do not have to use these features, but if you do, please use common sense and good judgment when posting in these community spaces or sharing your personal information with others through the Services.
Other Data We Collect
In addition to PII, we collect other Data from you when you use the Services, including:
Data that neither directly nor indirectly reveals your identity nor directly relates to you, such as statistics, or aggregated information. For example, we may aggregate Data to calculate the percentage of users accessing a specific Website, App, or feature of our Services;
Technical information, including browser type and version, or operating system and platform; and
Data about your interactions with our Services, including the full Uniform Resource Locators (URLs), clickstream to, through and from our Services (including date and time), products you viewed or searched for or (in the case of some of our Services) “favorited”; Service response times, download errors, length of visits, interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs), or methods used to browse away.
Special Category Data
Our business is customization! Depending on the Services you use and products you decide to create, you may select customization features reflecting skin tone, gender, gender identity, religious dress, disability status, sexual orientation, or other similar information, or revealing this or similar information through use of video and voice recording features. We strive to be inclusive in our product customization offerings and use this information to create that special product for your intended recipient.
Data About Children
We do not knowingly collect, use, process, share or store PII from children under the age of 18. The Services are not intended for use by children under the age of 18. If you believe that we have unknowingly collected PII from a child under the age of 18, contact us as soon possible at
privacy@pallcprivacy.com
. However, certain of the Services may collect information about children from an adult who creates a customized product about a child.
6. Why We Use and Process Data
Use and Processing of PII
We may use and process PII that is either collected by us or provided by you for the following purposes:
Providing the Services in the manner most effective for you and your Device;
Fulfilling your orders placed through the Services;
Making interest-based suggestions and recommendations about our products and Services;
Assessing the effectiveness of our advertising and tailoring our advertising so you receive only what is relevant to you;
Improving the Services and notifying you about changes;
Managing your customer relationship with us;
Enabling your participation in our Services' interactive, social media, or other similar features;
Integrating social media into your experience with our Services;
Carrying out your support requests;
Notifying you about unfinished transactions, unused credits, or order status;
Sending you information about discounts, special offers, and new products;
Managing the Services, including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, statistical analysis, security, quality control, and fraud prevention;
Verifying your identity;
Reminding you of special occasions;
Performing billing, administration, and collections functions;
Protecting the Services and our employees and operations;
For a Reorganisation Use;
Marketing to you directly through the social media platforms that you use and through other websites;
Sharing information with law enforcement agencies in response to formal or informal inquiries and with other third parties when required by law and pursuant to our internal policies;
Carrying out activities related to any of the above, or any other purpose for which the Data was collected, including dispute resolution and protection of our legal rights or the rights of third parties.
Use and Processing of Other Data
We may use Data that is not PII for any business purpose.
You can manage your preferences about how your Data is used by following the instructions in each form or communication you receive from us. For more information, see
Your Choices About Our Use of Data.
7. Who We Share Data with and Why
Sharing of PII
We may share Data within our Company Group to comply with internal, contractual and legal obligations, and for marketing activities.
We may also share Data with third parties as follows:
Business partners, suppliers, service providers, subcontractors and other third parties to enable them to provide services such as fulfillment, IT, logistics, delivery, communication, cybersecurity, fraud protection, and legal/audit. These parties are required to maintain the confidentiality of Data and are restricted from using it for any purposes other than those requested by us;
Social media platforms;
Advertisers and ad networks;
Public, governmental, or regulatory authorities and institutions; and
Potential buyers, investment banks or financial institutions in connection with any contemplated or actual corporate reorganizations or business transactions such as evaluating or conducting a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of our assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which Data held by us about our users is among the assets transferred (each, a “Reorganization Use”).
Courts, law enforcement authorities, regulators, attorneys or other third parties in connection with the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims.
Sharing of Other Data
We may share other Data without restriction.
Pursuant to our contractual relationship with Google, we do not share data received from Google for reasons other than providing or improving functionality. See the Google terms
here
for additional information.
8. Your Choices About Our Use of Data
Transactional Emails:
We occasionally send transactional emails notifying you about your orders, account information, changes to the Services, updates to our online documents, and other matters. You may not opt out of transactional emails.
Promotional Offers:
You can stop receiving promotional offers by following opt-out links in each promotional message, or contacting us at
privacy@pallcprivacy.com
and requesting your removal from our promotional offers list.
Push Notifications on Mobile App:
Depending on your Device, push notifications may be turned on by default. You can opt out of push notifications at any time by adjusting your Device settings.
Tracking Technologies and Advertising:
You can set your browser to refuse all or some browser cookies, or to alert you when websites set or access cookies. If you refuse all cookies, you will be unable to use the Services. If you disable or refuse some cookies, parts of our Services will be inaccessible or not function properly. For more information about tracking technologies, please see
Automated Technologies or Interactions
above.
Updating PII.
If you wish to update your account information, you may log into your account and make changes, or contact us via the Contact Us link in the App or Website you are using, and we will update or correct any account information at your request. For EU Data Subjects, please use the form located at the Manage Personal Information link at the bottom of each webpage to request correction of your PII.
9. How Long We Use and Store PII
We store PII from the time of collection as follows, unless contractual or legal obligations require us to store it for a different period:
If you neither create an account nor buy anything (even as a guest) we will delete PII about you at the earlier of your revocation of consent or in accordance with our Cookie Notice.
If you either create an account, or buy as a guest, we will delete PII about you at the first of the following:
You ask us to;
You have not created an account on any of our Services for a period of nine (9) years, or made a sale from any seller account;
You haven’t purchased anything for nine (9) years; or
With regard to a Social Security Number or Tax ID Number, you have not made a sale from any account using that number for a period of seven (7) years.
Pursuant to our contractual relationship with Meta, we store Platform Data received from Meta for no longer than five (5) years. See the Meta terms
here
for additional information.
10. How We Protect Data
The Services have physical, electronic, and administrative security measures in place designed to protect against the loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, use, alteration, or disclosure of Data under our control. When you submit credit card information through the Services, we create a nonce so your credit card information is never stored by us. While no transmission over the internet can be guaranteed as 100% secure, and we strive to protect PII during transmission, we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any Data that you transmit to or receive from us. We urge you to take steps to keep Data safe (including your account password), log out of your account after use, and close your web browser.
11. Opt-Out Preferences
California and Virginia residents may opt out of the sale and/or sharing of their information by broadcasting an Opt-Out Preference Signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (GPC) (on the browsers and/or browser extensions that support such a signal). To download and use a browser supporting the GPC browser signal, click here:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/orgs
. If you choose to use the GPC signal, you will need to turn it on for each supported browser or browser extension you use.
We can only link your request to opt-out of sale/sharing to your browser or device identifier, and not to any information about any account you may have with us. The connection between your browser or device and any account you have with us is not known to us. Accordingly, now that we have implemented GPC recognition, any prior choices you have made regarding sale/sharing of your personal information are no longer valid. If you wish to opt out of the sale/sharing of your information, you will need to do so by rebroadcasting the GPC signal to us now and again in the future to the extent you visit our website with a different device or clear the cookies cache from your current device.
12. Persons Outside the United States, EU, EEA, UK and Switzerland
You confirm that your command and knowledge of the language in which this Privacy Policy is written is sufficient to understand the terms and conditions in this Privacy Policy. If you live in the European Union, EEA, UK or Switzerland, or are located outside the United States: (i) you acknowledge that by using the Services, personal data about you may be transferred to our servers or third-party servers located in the United States in connection with the purposes stated in this Privacy Policy and expressly consent to such transfers, and (ii) you understand that the laws with respect to the protection of Data in the United States may not be as stringent as those in your home jurisdiction. If you live in or are in the European Union, EEA, UK or Switzerland, the Addendum for Persons Located in the European Union, UK, EEA and Switzerland EU below describes additional rights you might have.
13. Contact Us
If you have any concern about the privacy practices of the Services, please contact us at the following address with a detailed description of your concern, and we will try to resolve it:
Privacy Program
Attn: Legal Department
23801 Calabasas Road
Calabasas, CA 91302
USA
If you are in Europe,
We have appointed ITG EU & GRCI Law to act as our EU and UK Representatives, respectively. If you wish to exercise your rights under EU GDPR or the UK GDPR or have any queries in relation to your rights or privacy matters generally please email from Europe
privacyeu@pallcprivacy.com
, or from UK,
privacyuk@pallcprivacy.com
.
14. Updates to This Privacy Policy
Please check this Privacy Policy periodically to inform yourself of any changes. We reserve the right to modify this Privacy Policy at any time, so you should review it frequently. If we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will post notice of the changes on the Services homepage and/or as required by law notify you by email using the current email address for your account.
15. Addendum for Persons Residing in California
Effective Date:
April 15, 2023
This
Addendum for Persons Residing in California
(this “CCPA Notice”) supplements the Privacy Policy and applies only to residents of the State of California. This CCPA Notice is provided in compliance with the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (CCPA), and any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this CCPA Addendum.
How We Collect Personal Information
We collect “Personal Information” as defined in the CCPA. We collect Personal Information from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you. For example, from your creation of an account, forms you complete or products you purchase and Services you use, and when you participate in a contest or survey.
Indirectly from you. For example, from your interactions on the Websites or in the Apps.
From other companies in our Company Group.
From our business partners and service providers.
How We Share Personal Information
We disclose Personal Information to our Service Providers, Contractors and third-parties for business purposes pursuant to written agreements or contracts
Summary of Categories of Personal Information Collected, Sources, and Categories of Third Parties Shared With
The table below summarizes the Personal Information collected, used and shared by us or our Service Providers and Third Parties within the last twelve (12) months.
Category of Personal Information Collected
Collected
Categories of Sources from Which Personal Information is Collected
Purpose of Collection
Categories of Third Parties We Share Personal Information With for a Business Purpose
Category of Third Parties to whom Personal Information is Sold or Shared
Retention Period
Identifiers
, such as your name, address, phone number, Internet Protocol (IP) address, email address, social media handles, and account name.
If you choose to sell products and receive a royalty or commission, we also collect your social security number and/or tax identification number.
Yes
You, if you choose to provide it to us.
You, when you use the Services.
We and our Service Providers collect this info automatically. Our Service Providers that collect your IP address automatically
To respond to your communications to us.
To provide the Services to you.
Our Service Providers, such as our Website host, payment processors, social networks, order fulfilment processors, and analytics providers.
Advertisers and social networks
9 years from the date of your last interaction with us
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
, such as your name, address, phone number, credit or debit card number.
Only if you are a seller on the CafePress Website, your Social Security Number so that we may report tax information as required by law.
Some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
Yes
You, if you choose to provide it to us.
To fulfill your orders.
To comply with tax laws.
Our Service Providers such as delivery companies, payment processors, order fulfillment providers, printers, product distributors, and data analytics providers.
Advertisers and social networks
9 years from the date of your last interaction with us
Protected Classifications
, such as age (40 years or older), gender, etc.
Yes
You, directly.
Derived from your orders.
To analyze the demographics of our customer base.
Service Providers such as data analytics providers.
We do not sell or share this category of Personal Information
9 years from the date of your last interaction with us
Commercial information
, such as products or services purchased, obtained, or considered.
Yes
You, when you use the Services.
We and our service providers collect this info automatically.
To fulfill your orders and provide current and future Services to you.
Service Providers who help us determine our product mix and analyze our customer’s shopping and purchase preferences.
Our Service Providers such as delivery companies, payment processors, order fulfillment providers, printers, product distributors, and data analytics providers.
Our affiliates and subsidiaries.
Advertisers and social networks
9 years from the date of your last interaction with us
Biometric information
No
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
Internet network and electronic device activity
, such as browsing history, search history, and information regarding your interaction with an internet website, application, or advertisement
Yes
You, through your Device when you use the Services.
We and our service providers collect this information automatically.
Analytics providers
Advertising providers.
Cookies and tracking technologies.
Providing you with a good experience when you use the Services, such as the ability to serve content in your preferred language, provide pricing in local currency, store your user ID and/or password for your convenience, or pre-populate fields in your use of the Services.
Providing you with a good experience when you use the Services, such as the ability to serve content in your preferred language, provide pricing in local currency, store your user ID and/or password for your convenience, or pre-populate fields in your use of the Services
Our Service Providers such as data analytics providers.
Advertisers and social networks
Varies depending on the type of cookie collecting this Personal Information, but no more than 2 years 9 months
Geolocation data
Yes
You, if you choose to provide it to us.
You, through your Device, when you use the Services.
We and our Service Providers collect this info automatically.
Responding to your requests for information.
Shipping your products to you.
Providing you with a good experience when you visit the Services, such as the ability to serve content in your preferred language, provide pricing in local currency, store your user ID and/or password for your convenience, or pre-populate fields in your use of the Services.
Our Service Providers such as delivery companies and fraud prevention companies.
We do not sell or share this category of Personal Information
Varies depending on the type of cookie collecting this Personal Information, but no more than 2 years 9 months
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or other information
, such as audio recordings when you call our customer service telephone number, photographic or other images.
Yes
You, if you choose to provide it to us, or another customer provides it to us.
Incorporating the image into your products.
Storing the image for the customer for future use on other products.
Service Providers, such as printers and chat function hosting sites.
We do not sell or share this category of Personal Information
Varies depending on the type of cookie collecting this Personal Information, but no more than 2 years 9 months
Professional or employment-related information
No
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
Education information
, defined as information that is not publicly available personally identifiable information as defined in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g; 34 C.F.R. Part 99).
No
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
N/A
Inferences drawn from personal information,
such as a person’s preferences, characteristics, trends, predispositions, behavior, and attitudes.
Yes
Advertising networks, data analytics providers, and special occasions based on our review of product orders.
Targeted advertising, marketing analytics, reminders of special occasions.
Our Service Providers such as data analytics providers.
Advertisers and social networks
9 years from the date of your last interaction with us
Sensitive Personal Information,
such as Social Security, driver's license, passport, or state ID card numbers; account or debit or credit card numbers combined with passwords or codes that would enable access to the accounts; exact geolocation; racial origin, religious beliefs, or union membership; a consumer's mail, email, or text message content (unless the information was intentionally sent to us); genetic data such as DNA samples; and biometric data
Yes
You, if you choose to provide it to us
To fulfill your orders
Our Service Providers such as financial auditors, payment card processors, and fulfillment vendors.
We do not sell or share this category of Personal Information
9 years from the date of your last interaction with us
Your CCPA Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding Personal Information. This section describes your CCPA rights and explains how to exercise those rights.
CCPA Access to Specific Information
If you are a California resident, you have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of Personal Information about you over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable CCPA request (see Exercising
CCPA Access and Deletion Rights
below), we will disclose to you:
The categories of Personal Information we collected about you.
The categories of sources for the Personal Information we collected about you.
Our business purpose for collecting or selling that Personal Information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share that Personal Information.
The specific pieces of Personal Information we collected about you.
The categories of Personal Information shared for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes, and the categories of recipients to whom the Personal Information were disclosed for those purposes; and
The categories of Personal Information sold (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the Personal Information was sold.
CCPA Deletion Request Rights
California residents have the right to request that we delete any of the Personal Information that we collected from them and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable CCPA request (see
Exercising Your CCPA Rights
below), we will delete (and direct our Service Providers to delete) Personal Information about you from our records, unless an exception applies.
We may deny your deletion request if retaining the Personal Information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the Personal Information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, fulfill the terms of a written warranty or product recall conducted in accordance with law, or otherwise perform our contract with you.
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities
Debug products to identify and repair errors that impair intended functionality
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another CCPA user to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law.
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 et. seq.).
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with user expectations based on your relationship with us.
Comply with a legal obligation.
Make other internal and lawful uses of the information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
CCPA Correction Requests
California residents have the right to request that we correct any incorrect Personal Information that we collect or retain about them, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will correct (and direct any of our service providers that hold your data on our behalf to correct) your Personal Information from our records, unless an exception applies. We may deny your correction request if (a) we believe the Personal Information we maintain about you is accurate; (b) correcting the Personal Information would be impossible or involve disproportionate; or (c) if the request conflicts with our legal obligations.
CCPA Right to Opt Out of Sales or Sharing of Personal Information
California residents have the right to direct us not to “sell” their Personal Information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” their Personal Information to third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
Exercising CCPA Rights
To exercise the CCPA rights described above, please submit a verifiable CCPA request to us here: OneTrust Form or email us at
privacy@pallcprivacy.com
.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable CCPA request related to Personal Information about you. You may also make a verifiable CCPA request on behalf of your minor child. To designate someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, you may upload proof of the authorization to
privacy@pallcprivacy.com
.
You may make a verifiable CCPA request for access only twice within any 12-month period. The verifiable CCPA request must:
provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are either the person we collected Personal Information about or their authorized representative, which may include information that you have already provided to us, such as your name and email address; and
describe your CCPA request in sufficient detail so that we can properly understand your request and respond to it.
We may not respond to your CCPA request or provide you with Personal Information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Personal Information is about you or someone you are legally authorized to act on behalf of. Making a verifiable CCPA request does not require you to create an account with us.
We will use Personal Information provided in a verifiable CCPA request only to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
CCPA Response Timing and Format
We endeavor to respond to verifiable CCPA requests within forty-five (45) days of their receipt. If we require more time (up to 90 days) to respond to your request, we will inform you in writing of the reason and the needed extension period. If you have an account with us, we will deliver our written response to that account. If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response to the email address you provide on the CCPA Request Form.
Any CCPA disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding our receipt of your verifiable CCPA request. Our response will also explain the reasons we are not complying with your CCPA request, if applicable.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable CCPA request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the CCPA request warrants a fee, we will tell you why and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
CCPA Non-Discrimination
We do not discriminate against California residents for exercising their CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services.
Charge you different prices for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties.
Provide you with a different level or quality of goods or services.
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
CCPA Notice of Financial Incentive
We may offer you financial incentives for the collection, sale, retention, and use of your personal information as permitted by the CCPA that can, without limitation, result in reasonably different prices, rates, or quality levels.
Pursuant to the CCPA, this Notice is to provide you with information regarding any financial incentive or “price or service difference" that we may provide in exchange for your personal information. The Personal Information collected from you in exchange for financial incentive or “price or service difference” may include collecting the following categories of personal information from customers who participate: identifiers; customer records; protected class and demographic information; commercial information and preferences; internet or other electronic network activity information and device information; audio, electronic, visual, or other sensory information; and inferences.
In order to participate in our rewards program(s) and use our services, you may provide Personal Information from time to time, directly or indirectly, in exchange for cash, gift cards, or other financial incentive, or price or service difference, the amount or nature of which will be specified in each instance at the time the Personal Information is to be submitted. You can opt-in to the financial incentive or price or service difference by submitting Personal Information. If you wish to opt-out of the financial incentive or price or service difference, do not submit the Personal Information. If you opt-in and subsequently wish to withdraw from the financial incentive or price or service difference, you may request such withdrawal by contacting us here:
OneTrust Form
.
Each financial incentive or price or service difference related to the collection and use of Personal Information is based upon our sole reasonable, good-faith determination of the estimated value of such information to our business, taking into consideration the value of the offer itself and the anticipated revenue generation that may be realized by rewarding brand loyalty. We calculate the value of the offer and financial incentive by using the expense related to the offer. By participating in any of the above promotional programs, you agree that the benefits are reasonably related to the value of the Personal Information collected and contained.
Other California Privacy Rights
In addition to your rights under the CCPA, California’s “Shine the Light” law (Civil Code Section § 1798.83) permits users of the Services that are California residents to request certain information regarding our disclosure of Personal Information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. We do not disclose Personal Information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. If you would like more information about our compliance with California’s “Shine the Light” law, please send an email to
privacy@pallcprivacy.com
or write us at:
Privacy Program
Attn: Legal Department
23801 Calabasas Road
Calabasas, CA 91302
USA
Changes to this CCPA Notice
We reserve the right to amend this CCPA Notice at our discretion and at any time. When we make changes to this Notice, we will post the updated Notice on the Services and update the Notice’s effective date.
Your continued use of the Services following the posting of any changes to this Notice constitutes your acceptance of those changes.
CCPA Contact Information
If you have questions or comments about this Notice, the ways in which we collect and use Personal Information, your choices and rights regarding such use, or you wish to exercise your rights under California law, please contact us at:
Email:
privacy@planetart.com
Web Form:
OneTrust Form
Postal Address: Privacy Program, Attention: Legal Department, 23801 Calabasas Road, Calabasas, California 91302-1547
16. Addendum for Persons Located in the European Union, UK, EEA and Switzerland
This
Addendum for Persons Located in the European Union, UK, EEA and Switzerland
(this “GDPR Notice”) supplements the information contained in the Privacy Policy and applies solely to persons located in the EU, UK, EEA and Switzerland. We adopt this GDPR Notice to comply with GDPR, and any terms defined in GDPR (including Personal Data) have the same meaning when used in this GDPR Notice.
In General
We
do not
intentionally collect, use, process, share or store special categories of Personal Data, although you may provide information which constitutes special category Personal Data as part of your personalization choices.
Who is Responsible for Personal Data About You?
We are responsible for Personal Data about you. Specifically Personal Data is controlled by:
Privacy Program,
Attention: Legal Department
55 Peach Street,
Wokingham, Berkshire, RG40 1XP,
United Kingdom
We have appointed ITG EU & GRCI Law to act as our EU and UK Representatives. If you wish to exercise your rights under EU GDPR or the UK GDPR or have any queries in relation to your rights or privacy matters generally please email from Europe
privacyeu@pallcprivacy.com
, or from UK
privacyuk@pallcprivacy.com
.
We may need to request additional information from you in order to confirm your identity before responding to your request or question.
On Which EU Legal Basis Do We Process Personal Data About You?
Depending on the specific purpose or purposes for the processing of the Personal Data, we rely on the following legal grounds:
Performance of your customer contract or other contractual obligations or in order to take steps before entering into a contract with you;
Compliance with a legal obligation (such as record obligations for our commercial or tax purposes or other regulatory obligations);
Protection of your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person; or
Our legitimate interests or those of any third-party recipients that receive the Personal Data, provided that such interests are not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms;
Important reasons of public interest;
The establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims.
Legitimate interests include, for example, developing and improving our internal administration or business and service processes, marketing and reputation activities, keeping our records up to date, handling and managing our legal and contractual duties and obligations, and compliance with internal and legal policies and regulations that apply to us.
In addition, we process Personal Data to let you know about updates to products and services you have purchased from us or expressed interest in before.
Will Personal Data About You be Transferred Outside the EU/EEA?
Our headquarters and operations are in the United States, UK and Ireland. We strive to store and process EU, UK, EEA and Swiss Personal Data in Ireland, on the servers located in the EU. With the exception of Personal Creations and Café Press, all EU/EEA customer Personal Data is processed and stored on Amazon Web Services (AWS) servers located in Ireland (see more information below). Personal Creations and Café Press customer Personal Data is processed and stored on AWS Servers in the U.S.
Notice Re: EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield, CJEU Schrems II Ruling and EU Standard Contract Clauses (SCC)
We have withdrawn from the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Union and Switzerland to the United States as further described below.
On July 16, 2020, the European Court of Justice (CJEU) determined that the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield framework is no longer valid for the transfer of Personal Data from the European Economic Area (EEA) to the U.S. (known as the Schrems II decision). The Schrems II decision also placed additional compliance requirements on the use of EU Standard Contract Clauses (SCC) for the transfer of EU/EEA Personal Data to the U.S. by companies subject to Section 702 of the U.S. Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Act (FISA) and/or Executive Order 12333 (E.O. 12333).
We know our customers, website visitors, and business partners care deeply about privacy and data security, and we optimize our work to get these issues right. We’d like to confirm that you can continue to use our Services with regard to EU and EEA Personal Data in compliance with EU law.
First
, please know that it is our good-faith belief that the types of EU/EEA Personal Data we collect, use, process, share and/or store in the U.S. are not of the types of Personal Data that would generally be subject to requests from U.S. government authorities pursuant to FISA Section 702 and/or E.O. 12333.
Second
, please note that as part of our good-faith efforts to comply with applicable data protection laws, we strive to continue to store and process EU, EEA, UK and Swiss Personal Data in Ireland, on servers located in the EU. In compliance with the GDPR and other applicable laws we also implement data encryption, data minimization, data pseudonymization, and need to know access to Personal Data.
Third
, although we have withdrawn from Privacy Shield, we are retaining the data collected during our participation, and are providing adequate protection for such data by another authorized means.
Fourth
, when international transfer of Personal Data is necessary to perform a contract with you, or in individual cases for the purposes of our compelling legitimate business interests and in order to comply with our internal policies, contractual and legal obligations.
If you represent one of our service providers or business partners and your organization is a party to an agreement with us that includes EU Standard Contract Clauses (SCC) for compliance with EU/EEA data protection laws, please contact us at
privacy@pallcprivacy.com
to discuss whether any updates to our agreement are needed resulting from the
Schrems II
decision.
Trust is a top priority for us, and we will continue to work vigilantly to ensure that our customers, website visitors, and business partners are able to continue to enjoy the benefits of our Services securely, compliantly, and without disruption.
Your Consent to Transfer of Personal Data
In addition to the above, we may also process, store, and/or transfer Personal Data we collect about you, in and to a country outside the EU including the United States. Those other countries may have different privacy laws that may or may not be as comprehensive as your own.
By submitting Personal Data or interacting with our Services, you consent to this transfer, storing, and/or processing including in the United States.
Your Personal Data Use Choices
See Section 8 (
Your Choices About Our Use of Data
) above.
How Can I Access or Correct Personal Data About Me?
You may exercise your access, correction or deletion rights by using the form located at the
Manage Personal Information
link at the bottom of each webpage. Alternatively, you may send us an email from Europe at
privacyeu@pallcprivacy.com
or from the UK to
privacyuk@pallcprivacy.com
to request access to, correction, or deletion of Personal Data that you have provided to us. In some situations, we cannot delete Personal Data about you except by also deleting your user account. Please note that deletion of your account will cause you to lose your stored photos, completed and in-process projects, and all content you have uploaded for sale through any of our Services with Shops or Marketplaces.
If this Data is deleted by us at your request, we will not be able get it back for you if you change your mind in the future.
We may not be able to grant a request to change or delete Personal Data about you if we believe the change or deletion would violate any law or legal requirement or negatively affect the accuracy of the Data.
If you delete your User Contributions from our Services, copies may still be viewable in cached and archived pages or where other users have copied or stored them. Our terms of use govern proper access and use of information provided on our Services, including User Contributions.
PRIVACY POLICY
|
TERMS OF USE
|
MANAGE MY INFORMATION
|
MANAGE MY COOKIE CHOICES
Copyright © 2012-2025 PlanetArt, LLC. All rights reserved.
FreePrints and the FreePrints logo are trademarks or pending trademarks of PlanetArt, LLC.
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookies Settings
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
Switch Label
label
Switch Label
label
Switch Label
label
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.paypal.com/us/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
PayPal Privacy Statement
Overview
Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
Categories of Personal Information We Collect
How is Personal Information used?
Do We Disclose Personal Information, and why?
How long does PayPal store your Personal Information?
How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
Your Data Protection Rights
How Do We Protect Your Personal Information?
Can Children Use Our Services?
Definitions
Our Contact Information
CCPA California Notice at Collection
US Consumer Privacy Notice
Download Printable PDF
PayPal Privacy Statement
Last updated on February 13, 2025
Overview
PayPal, Inc. (“we,” “our,” “us,” “PayPal”) provides this Privacy Statement to describe our use of your Personal Information when you use your PayPal account, Xoom account, visit our websites, or apply for, or use our Services, like Braintree and Zettle. This Privacy Statement does not apply to Excluded Services, such as Venmo and Hyperwallet.
We encourage you to read this Privacy Statement and to use it to help you make informed decisions.
Certain capitalized terms that are not otherwise defined in the Statement are explained in the
Definitions
section below.
We revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, Services, or applicable laws. If the revised version requires notice in accordance with applicable law, we will provide you with 30 days prior notice by posting notice of the change on the "
Policy Updates
" or "
Privacy Statement
" page of our website, otherwise the revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date. If you are a new User or are receiving this Privacy Statement for the first time and there is an upcoming change described on the
Policy Updates
or Privacy Statement page at the time you receive this Privacy Statement, such upcoming change will apply to you on the indicated effective date.
For most of our Services, we act as a “data controller” or “business”, however there are some products and features where PayPal may also act as a “data processor” or “service provider” when providing services to our Partners and Merchants.  The “data controller” or “business” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that has the control over the purposes and means by which the data processing is performed.  The “data processor” or “service provider” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that processes the Personal Information for the data controller, for the data controller’s specific purposes, and as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection laws.
Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
Our Services may be accessed by individuals without a PayPal or Xoom account. We will collect Personal Information from you even if you are a non-account holder when you use our Services, such as when you use our Pay Without a PayPal account, use Unbranded Payment Services (e.g., Braintree and Zettle), use a Fastlane profile, or when a non-accountholder receives a payment through the Visa+ service from a PayPal account holder (“Recipient”). If you Pay Without a PayPal account, we may link your transaction information with your PayPal account, if you have one at the time you use the Service without logging in, or if you create a PayPal account later.
With a Fastlane profile, individuals can store their payment methods and other Personal Information with PayPal so that they can complete the checkout process faster,  create a store or loyalty account, or facilitate other transactions at participating Partners and Merchants with payment card, contact information, shipping data or other data they save in their Fastlane profile as relevant to the specific interaction, participating Partner or Merchant, all without having to manually input payment method details and other Personal Information each time they checkout ("Fastlane").
When you create a Fastlane profile, you are agreeing to let PayPal store your Personal Information, including your name, email, phone number, address information, billing information and payment method details, and other data that may be relevant to specific Partner or Merchant interactions, and pre-populate that information in the checkout flows or other interactive features of participating Partners and Merchants so that you can  enjoy a faster Partner and Merchant experience by not having to manually input  your payment or other information. We will also collect transaction and other Partner or Merchant data related to your purchases and other Partner or Merchant interactions when you use Fastlane. If you have a Fastlane profile, we may recognize you as a Fastlane user when you shop on the participating Partners’ and Merchants’ sites, and we may prompt you to engage in participating Partner or Merchant interactions, such as registering for a store or loyalty account using your Fastlane profile information. If you choose to interact with participating Partners or Merchants through Fastlane, you agree to let PayPal disclose your Fastlane profile information to the Participating Partners and Merchants and their service providers, and to facilitate your transaction and shopping experience on the participating Partners and Merchants sites.
The Visa+ Service enables eligible customers with a PayPal account to send and receive money to and from Venmo and third-party Visa+-enabled digital wallets (“Visa+”).
When you shop on Partner and Merchant sites, the Partner or Merchant may disclose Personal Information with PayPal that we will use in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal user agreement.
Categories of Personal Information We Collect
Categories of Personal Information collected
from you
, including from your interactions with us and use of the Services:
Personal Identifiers
: Such as Name, Business Name, Address, Phone Number, Email, IP address, Device Information, Information collected from cookies or other tracking technologies, other information necessary to establish an account or profile.
Records and Financial Information
: Such as, bank account and routing numbers, credit and debit card information, amount you send or request, other financial information.
Transaction and Experience Information
: Such as online shopping cart information, shopping activity and goods or services considered on Partners and Merchants sites, shipping options and associated costs when you check out, purchase history, and order tracking and product information.
Geolocation
: We may collect IP-based geolocation data and Global Positioning System (GPS) with your consent during your user experience or based on your mobile application settings.
Internet or network activity
: interactions with our Services, Information about response time for web pages, download errors, date and time when you used the service, Location Information, such as your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies (“
Technical Usage Data
”).
Biometric
: When you consent in the user experience, we collect voice identification, photo identification, or face scans to verify your identity and authenticate you for certain actions related to your account, including, for example, verify your identity and authenticate you to meet regulatory requirements or before you access accounts and Services, recover passwords, update profile info, manage payments and payment methods, lift account limitations, and initiate cryptocurrency transfers.
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information
: Call recordings when you talk to customer service.
Professional or employment information:
including business information, job title, contact emails, phone numbers and taxpayer ID numbers.
Imported Contact Information:
including name, address, phone number, images, email address or usernames associated with the contacts.
PayPal Account Profile Information:
username, profile picture, gender, or personal description which you add that may include sensitive personal information. You can set your profile to “Private” at any time.
Information you provide when you contact us:
Your response to surveys, recorded conversations, chat conversations with us, email correspondence with us, account or profile status, repayment history, voice identification, Information about others if you choose to share it with us.
Inferred data:
We may infer information about you such as your preferences and shopping behavior, based on your transactions and interactions with our Services or with our Partners and Merchants.
Characteristics of Protected Classifications:
including age or date of birth, national origin, disability, citizenship, military status.
Sensitive Personal Information:
Social Security number, government-issued identification, bank account and routing numbers, credit and debit card information, voice identification and Photo IDs or Precise Geolocation.
Information from your device:
including, language settings, browser ID, cookie preferences, time zone, operating system, platform, screen resolution and similar information about your device settings, data collected from cookies or other tracking technologies.
We may also obtain the above categories of Personal Information from the following
categories of sources
:
Excluded Services including Venmo and PayPal Honey.
Third parties: Service Providers, Partners and Merchants, Payment Partners, such as card networks and payment processors, Credit Reporting Agencies, Government Entities, Data Brokers, and Financial Institutions.
Linked Accounts: Non-financial or financial accounts you agree to link to PayPal, such as social network accounts, mail accounts or for open banking. You may change your mind about use of this feature and unlink your linked accounts at any time. If you choose to link these accounts or share such information with us, we will periodically collect and process it until you unlink the account.
Third Party Applications: Applications that you choose to use for example, the Apple App Store, Google Play Store, or social networking sites.
How is Personal Information used?
We may process your Personal Information for a variety of reasons, including to provide our Services, for security and fraud prevention and to comply with law. We may also use personal data to participate in certain features, that while not necessary for use of the Services, may be of interest to you, such as syncing your contact list to your account, personalize content and offers, targeted advertising, or connecting to a third-party platform. Some of these features may be offered with an opt-out, or require your consent to enable.
We may collect Personal Information to:
Provide our Services
: such as to help you send, receive or request money, initiate a payment, add monetary value to an account, pay a bill, administer your purchases, display shipping options and associated costs when you check out, show you your Fastlane profile, account and payment information, send and receive Visa+ transactions, to assess your creditworthiness in connection with our Services, confirm your identity and your contact information, to authenticate your access to your account or Fastlane profile and to confirm your account or profile and financial information is accurate and up to date. For Visa+, we will receive the recipient's name and payment information from Visa and third-party Visa+ participating digital wallets for the purpose of processing and matching Visa+ payment transactions between participating digital wallets and PayPal. If you are using Fastlane, we will also use your Personal Information and payment method details to determine whether the payment you are making with a participating Partner or Merchant is authorized by you and likely to be successfully authorized by the payment method you choose to use when you make a purchase using details from your Fastlane profile.
Provide receipts in connection with Zettle services
: For buyers using our Zettle services (including Venmo Tap to Pay), you may choose to provide us your contact details so that we can send you digital receipts. If you provide your e-mail address or mobile number to a Partner or Merchant who uses Zettle, we may remember your details for the next time you buy something from a Merchant who uses Zettle in its physical store, if you use the same payment card. This is regardless of whether if you have previously bought something from this Merchant or not. This means that your e-mail address or mobile number will be pre-filled in the receipt view for your convenience the next time you buy something from a Merchant who uses Zettle in its physical store.
Manage and improve our Services:
for example, to develop new products and features, for customer analysis, to administer our Services, and for internal operations, for example troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, and statistical purposes.
Manage fraud and risk
: We conduct risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management to protect our customers and business, including fraud that involves our Partners and Merchants and strategic ventures.
Associate information about you:
if you use our Services without a PayPal account (e.g., Pay Without a PayPal account), we may associate such transactions with your PayPal account if you have one or later establish an account.
If you use one of the following Services: Fastlane, Venmo, and PayPal Honey; we may associate information about your transactions and experiences using these Services to personalize content and offers and improve your use of the PayPal services.
Market our Services
: We may use Personal Information to market our Services including where we partner with others to offer similar services to market about our Partners and Merchants. We use Personal Information,
including when we associate information about you,
to better understand and cater to your interests.
Communicate with you
: We may contact you when you need us, such as answering a question you sent to our customer service team.
Comply with Laws:
to comply with applicable laws and rules and enforce our agreements with you and other people who use our Services.
Process information about your contacts:
to make it easy for you to find and connect them, improve payment accuracy and suggest connections with people you may know.
By providing us with information about your contacts you certify that you have permission to provide that information to PayPal for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement.
Create an account connection between your account and a third-party account or platform
: such as with a social media account or a financial institution in connection with your participation in Open Banking.
Send you locally relevant options
: If you agree to let us track your precise location, we can customize our Services by using the right language and personalizing content such as providing location-based options, functionality or offers, ads and search results.
Even if you don’t allow us to track your location, we may still use your address to send you location-based options recommended by businesses that are near to your address.
Develop product recommendations
: We may use insights from purchases and other behaviors on our and our Partner or Merchant websites or apps to develop product recommendations about products, brands, sizes, preferences and styles that we provide to our Partners and Merchants so that they can recommend relevant products to you.
Remember your preferences
: We may remember your preferences for the next time you use the Services, such as whether you choose to receive digital receipts via email or text when you checkout.
Personalize your experience
: When you use Services, as well as other third-party sites and services, we might use tracking technologies like cookies. See our
Cookie Statement
for more details.
Do We Disclose Personal Information, and why?
We do not sell Personal Information to third parties for money or share your Personal Information for cross context behavioral advertising, including any sensitive personal information.
However, we may disclose customer insights, product recommendations, sizes, and preferences to Partners and Merchants to help them and us improve your shopping experience to make it more convenient and personalized for you.
If you choose to interact with participating Partners and Merchants through Fastlane, we will disclose your Fastlane profile information with the participating Partners and Merchants and their service providers, and facilitate your transaction, shopping experience or other interaction on participating Partners and Merchants sites.
We will also disclose your Personal Information with third parties to help us provide Services, protect our customers from risk and fraud, market our products, and comply with legal obligations.
We may disclose your sensitive personal information as appropriate to carry out legitimate business activities allowed by law.
Read more about our sharing practices below.
In addition, we may disclose Personal Information with the following categories of third parties:
Excluded Services
, including Venmo to provide you with the Services, personalize your use of the Services, to manage our business; or with PayPal Honey to manage our Rewards program.
Authorities
, if compelled to do so by a subpoena, court order, or similar legal procedure; when it is necessary to do so to comply with law; or where the disclosure of Personal Information is reasonably necessary to prevent physical harm or financial loss, to report suspected illegal activity, or to investigate violations of the relevant agreement, or as otherwise required by law that requires PayPal or Excluded Services to respond. Such authorities include courts, governments, law enforcement, and regulators. We may also be required to provide other third parties information about your use of our Services, for example to comply with card association rules, to investigate or enforce violations of our user agreement or to prevent physical harm or illegal activity.
Other financial institutions
, to jointly offer a product, such as PayPal Credit, PayPal Savings, PayPal Cashback Mastercard and PayPal Extra Mastercard.
Card networks and payment processors,
to facilitate payment processing or to add cards to your electronic wallet. For payment transactions with Fastlane, your Personal Information will be shared with the provider of the payment services for the participating Partner and Merchant to enable the processing of the payment transaction. The payment provider for the Partner and Merchant may be PayPal or a third party payment provider.
Fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
, for example to assist us in detecting activities suggestive of fraud.
Credit reporting and debt collection agencies,
for example to collect unpaid overdue debts through a third party such as a debt collection agency.
Service providers
that operate at our direction and on our behalf to perform services we outsource to them, such as processing payments, marketing, research, compliance, audits, corporate governance, communications, IT development, maintenance, hosting and support and customer service operations.
Other PayPal Account Holders to complete a transaction
. Some Personal Information is disclosed to other PayPal account holders as required to complete a payment transaction. This includes your username, profile photo, first and last name, email, and phone number.
Other Users in accordance with your account settings
. In accordance with your
account settings
or PayPal.Me preferences, your Personal Information can be seen by other account holders and non-account holders (“Users”) to help facilitate a transaction. For example, as part of the send money feature, a User may search for your account to initiate a payment. Based on your account settings, the information shown to other Users may include your username, profile photo, first and last name, email, phone number, city and state, month and year of PayPal account creation, and any additional information you include in the details or “about you” section of your account.
Other Users if you have a business profile
.  If you have a business profile, we will display a payment link and disclose certain information about you to other Users, including your name or business name, profile picture or logo, and the city associated with your PayPal account, as well as total time selling with us, total number of followers, and total number of unique Users that have paid you in the past year.
If you have a business profile, you can choose to display other information to other Users, such as your street address, phone number, email and website, in accordance with your business profile settings.
Linked accounts
, for example any social media accounts you asked us to link or when you link an account with another bank or
financial institutions,
card account, or aggregator
in connection with your participation in Open Banking
, so we can check if you have sufficient funds or confirm your ownership of the account.
Partners and Merchants, their service providers and others involved in a transaction
, for example when you use the Services to initiate online purchases, save your payment information with Fastlane, pay other Users using the Services, pay Recipients using Visa+, or return goods we may disclose information about you and your account or Fastlane profile with the other parties (or their service providers) involved in processing your transactions. We may also disclose Personal Information to Partners and Merchants to enable their use of our Services to facilitate your transactions.  For example, when you visit a participating Partner or Merchant site or app, the Partner or Merchant can check whether you are a user of PayPal services and present a recommended payment method to you to simplify your checkout process.
For our PayPal customers
, we may disclose your Personal Information to Partners and Merchants that you and we interact with, to help ourselves and Partners and Merchants personalize services and offers so you can have a better and more relevant experience.  Personal Information we disclose includes, for example, products, sizes, preferences, and styles we think you’ll like.
Unless we are required by law to obtain your consent, we disclose Personal Information collected you after November 27, 2024 (or from earlier if you consent) for personalized shopping experiences.
To opt-out of disclosures or Personal Information to Partners and Merchants for personalized shopping experiences, log into your PayPal account and edit your preferences in the Data and Privacy setting.
If you opt-out, we will continue to disclose your Personal Information as necessary to complete transactions you initiate, but will not disclose Personal Information to Partners and Merchant for personalized shopping experiences.
Please note
that Personal Information disclosed to Partners and Merchants (or their
service providers) involved in a transaction is subject to the Partners' and Merchants' own privacy policies and
procedures. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of Partners and Merchants.
Other third parties
, for example we disclose Personal Information to advertising platforms at your direction, or security service providers to help prevent unauthorized access to our Services.
Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the Personal Information that you share directly with them
. For example, we use Google’s reCAPTCHA to prevent misuse of our Services, when you access our mobile application. We may also use Google Address Autofill to ensure accuracy of your address. Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
apply to the Personal Information you share with them.
Buyers or in connection with business transfer
,
for example if we are involved in a merger, a purchase or sale of all or part of our business or assets, including receivables and debts, we may disclose, under appropriate data protection terms, your Personal Information to an interested or actual buyer of those business or assets. If PayPal or a significant portion of PayPal’s assets are acquired by a third party, Personal Information may also be disclosed.
How long does PayPal store your Personal Information?
We retain Personal Information for as long as needed or is permitted in context of the purpose for which it was collected and consistent with applicable law.
The criteria used to determine our retention period is as follows:
Personal Information used for the ongoing relationship between you and PayPal is stored for the duration of the relationship plus a period of 10 years, unless we need to keep it longer, such as:
a legal obligation or compliance with laws to which we are subject is retained consistent with the applicable law, such as under applicable bankruptcy laws and AML obligations
litigation, investigations, audit and compliance practices, or to protect against legal claims.
We retain biometric data for as long as needed or permitted given the purpose for which it was collected and no more than 3 years after your account closes, unless otherwise required by applicable law.
How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you interact with our Services, open email we send you, or visit a third-party website for which we provide Services, we and our partners use cookies and other tracking technologies such as pixel tags, web beacons, and widgets (collectively, “Cookies”) to recognize you as a user, customize your online experiences and online content, including to serve you interest-based advertising, perform analytics; mitigate risk and prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Services.
We use Cookies to collect your device information, internet activity information, and generate inferences as described above.
You can disable or decline some Cookies for our Services. But, since some parts of our service rely on Cookies to work, those services could become difficult or impossible to use.
Some web browsers have an optional setting called “Do Not Track” (DNT) that lets you opt-out of being tracked by advertisers and some third parties. Because many of our services won’t function without tracking data, we do not respond to DNT settings.
If you want to know more about how we use cookies, please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
. To learn how to opt-out of this kind of tracking technology, visit
About Ads
.
Your Data Protection Rights
Your rights to access, correction, deletion, and restriction to use or share your Personal Information.
Under applicable data protection law, depending upon the jurisdiction in which you reside and subject to applicable exceptions and definitional differences among various state laws, you may have certain rights about how your Personal Information is collected, stored, used and shared.
We recognize the importance of your ability to control the use of your Personal Information and provide several ways for you to exercise your rights to access (right to know your information), right to know third-parties to which we have disclosed Personal Information, correction, deletion (erasure), and to restrict certain information (right to opt-out of sharing and right to limit use and disclosure of sensitive personal information).
Certain state laws also provide residents of those states with the right to opt out of the “sale” (disclosing Personal Information in exchange for money or other consideration) or “sharing” (disclosing Personal Information for cross-context behavioral advertising) of your Personal Information or use of your Personal Information for certain types of targeted advertising.  Global Privacy Control settings is a browser setting that notifies website owners of users' privacy preferences regarding selling or sharing their Personal Information for cross-context behavioral advertising. PayPal does not respond to the Global Privacy Control signal because we do not sell or share your data.
We will not deny you services, charge you different prices, or provide you with a different level of service solely for exercising your privacy rights; although, certain personalized services for PayPal customers may not provide the same level of personalization with limited data sharing. If you are a California resident, learn more about how we handle your
Privacy Rights
.
How do you exercise your rights?
If you, or an authorized agent where permitted, want to exercise any of your rights relating to your Personal Information,
contact us
or submit your request from your account settings. If you have a PayPal account, you can exercise your privacy rights by accessing “Data and Privacy” from account settings in the PayPal app.
If you, or an authorized agent where permitted, want to exercise any of your rights relating to your Personal Information in your Fastlane profile,
contact us
or submit your request from your Fastlane profile management portal.
Even if you do not have a PayPal account (for example, where you use Pay without a PayPal account), you can submit a request for access, correction, or deletion of your Personal Information by contacting us at the number provided in our
Contact Information
section.
We’ll first need to verify who you are before we can respond to your request. We may ask you to provide us with information necessary to reasonably verify your identity before responding to your request. We will compare the information you submit against our internal business records to verify your identity. If we can’t verify your identity, we will not be able to fulfill your request. If we deny your request in whole or in part, you may have the right to appeal the decision. In such circumstances, we will provide you with information regarding the appeals process.
Your
right to request a copy of the Personal Information
. If you want to request the data we’ve collected about you in the past 12 months, you have choices:
Log in to your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile management portal, and submit a request
Call or contact us
and request that we provide you with the data we’ve collected.
Your right
to correct your Personal Information:
Log in to your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile management portal, and correct any information that you've previously added. For example, you can edit your addresses in your settings
Call or contact us
and request that we correct specific information
Your right
to delete your Personal Information:
Log in to your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile management portal, and delete any information that you've previously added. For example, you may delete your non-primary addresses in your settings
Call us or contact us
and request that we delete specific information
Close your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile
If you close your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile, or request that we delete Personal Information, we still need to keep some Personal Information as explained in
How long does PayPal store your Personal Information
section so we can:
Complete a transaction, provide goods or services you requested, or comply with our promises to you in the user agreement or other contract you have with us
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, or illegal activity
Protect your (or another person’s) legal rights, including the right to free speech
Manage our internal business processes that are reasonably related to your expectations when using our Services
Comply with laws and other legal or governmental processes
California also offers a right to opt out of “Selling” and “Sharing” Personal Information. The Global Privacy Control setting is a browser setting that notifies website owners of users' privacy preferences regarding selling or sharing their personal information. PayPal does not respond to these settings because we do not sell or share data. Some personal information collected, processed, or disclosed by a financial institution are subject to federal laws, such as the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act. Consumers may read our
Consumer Privacy Notice
for more information about their rights under US federal law.
Understanding your choices
You can control how Personal Information is collected or disclosed, as well as how we communicate with you. Here are some of the ways you can customize your choices.
Choose how we collect Personal Information
You may choose to limit the Personal Information you provide when our apps or Services request it. To help make choices that are right for you, it’s important to understand that Personal Information helps us provide a richer, more personalized experience for you. Also, some Personal Information is required for our Services to function.
For example, sharing your contacts helps make it easier for you to find the people you want to send money to. If you choose not to share your contacts with us, you can still use our mobile apps, but some actions may not be as fast or easy as it would be if you shared your contacts. Another example is creating an account or Fastlane profile with us. If you choose not to provide information that is required for an account or Fastlane profile to function, like your name and email address, we will not be able to create an account or Fastlane profile for you.
Choose how linked accounts collect and use Personal Information
If you link your account to a third-party service, you may be able to manage how your Personal Information is collected, used, and shared by them. Read the third parties’ privacy policies to see the choices they offer you.
You can control which third-party services you link to your account and what Personal Information they can collect about you. For example, to manage the permissions, go to the Security settings in your PayPal account.
Choose what we disclose with other Users
Some Personal Information may be seen by other Users. You may be able to adjust or turn off this setting in the Data and Privacy section in your account settings.
Choose what we share with Partners and Merchants for Personalized Shopping
Unless we are required by law to obtain your consent, we share Personal Information collected after November 27, 2024 (or from earlier if you consent) for personalized shopping experiences. Personal Information we disclose includes, for example, products, preferences, sizes, and styles we think you’ll like. To opt-out of Personal Information sharing with Partners and Merchants for personalized shopping experiences, log into your PayPal account and edit your preferences in the Data and Privacy setting. If you opt-out, we will continue to disclose your Personal Information as necessary to complete transactions you initiate but will not disclose Personal Information to Partners and Merchants for personalized shopping experiences.
Choose how we communicate with you
Your choices about how we communicate with you differ depending on the purpose of the message and how it is delivered. Some messages are considered optional, and some are necessary for you to manage your accounts or Fastlane profile with us. We use email, text messages, push notifications on your mobile device, and even phone calls or paper mail depending on the situation and your preferences.
You can click the unsubscribe link in a PayPal or Fastlane marketing email, opt-out of a text message by replying “STOP,” or turn off notifications on your device. You can also change your account’s notification settings or the notification preferences on your device.
You won’t be able to opt-out of messages that are considered necessary for the Services, such as digital receipts and emails that alert you to changes in your account or Fastlane profile's status. You may be able to decide how we send those messages, such as by email, phone, text message, or a notification on your mobile device.
How Do We Protect Your Personal Information?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Information against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centers, and information access authorization controls. While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and account/Fastlane profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Information we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Information that we share with a third-party based on a linked account connection that you have authorized.
Can Children Use Our Services?
We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Information, from children under the age of 13 or other individuals who are not legally allowed to use our Services. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Information from someone not allowed to use our Services, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
Please
contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from someone not allowed to use our Services.
We do not sell to third parties for money, or share Personal Information of anyone under 16 years of age, for the purpose of cross-context behavioral advertising.
Definitions
Device Information means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device.
Excluded Services means companies or separate brands, affiliates, or subsidiaries of PayPal, who process Personal Information in accordance with their own terms of service and separate privacy statements. Examples include Venmo, Honey Science LLC, Chargehound LLC, Hyperwallet, Simility, Swift Financial LLC, and Bill Me Later, Inc
Geolocation Information means information that identifies, with precise specificity, your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through your GPS, or your device settings.
Location Information means information that identifies, with reasonable specificity, your approximate location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS or Wi-Fi or cell site triangulation.
Partners and Merchants means our partners and the merchants, partners or businesses that our Users transact with for the purpose of obtaining goods or services.
Pay Without a PayPal account means our Services may be accessed by individuals without using a PayPal account, a Fastlane profile, or the Unbranded Payment Services. Pay Without a PayPal account does not include Venmo, which is subject to its own terms of service and separate privacy statement.
PayPal means PayPal, Inc. which offers PayPal, Xoom, Unbranded Payment Services, and Fastlane profile services.
Personal Information in this Privacy Statement means information about you, including your identity, finances and online behavior.
Sell under California law is defined as the disclosure of Personal Information to third parties in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration.
Services means any PayPal, Unbranded Payment Services, Pay Without a PayPal account, Fastlane, Xoom, Zettle (including Tap to Pay), bill pay, Rewards, sending or receiving money, credit products and services, including those offered with our Partners and Merchants, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered to you by PayPal, with the exception of the Excluded Services. Your use of the Services includes use of our Sites.
Sharing under California law is defined as the targeting of advertising to a consumer based on that consumer’s Personal Information obtained from the consumer’s activity across websites.
Sites means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Unbranded Payment Services means when you are interacting with and making payments to Partners and Merchants using our card processing and/or ACH origination services that do not carry the PayPal brand or when you use our Braintree or Zettle services.
Our Contact Information
If you have questions about this Privacy Statement or your Personal Information, contact us so we can help.
To talk about your PayPal account or Unbranded Payment Services:
Call PayPal Customer Service at 1-888-221-1161
or
visit our Customer Service web portal
To talk about your Fastlane profile:
Call PayPal Customer Service at 1-844-705-3555
Or visit your
Fastlane profile management portal
To talk about your Xoom account:
Call Xoom Customer Service at 1-877-815-1531
or
visit our Help Center web portal
CCPA California Notice at Collection
Most of the Personal Information we collect is subject to federal and state privacy laws that apply to financial institutions. To the extent the Personal Information is not subject to these federal and state financial privacy laws and to the extent it is collected in California about California residents, the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) may apply. The following section pertains only to Personal Information that is subject to the CCPA (“CCPA personal information”) and makes statements that reference unique definitions and requirements of law.
This CCPA California Notice at Collection describes: (1) the purpose for which we use each category of “CCPA personal information” we collect; and (2) the categories of third parties to which we (a) disclose CCPA personal information for a business purpose, and/or (b) “share” CCPA personal information for “cross-context behavioral advertising” and/or (c) “sell” such CCPA personal information, as applicable.
Under California law, “sharing” is defined as the sharing or disclosure of CCPA personal information by a business to a third party, for the targeting of advertising to a consumer, based on that consumer’s personal information obtained from the consumer’s CCPA activity across businesses, websites, applications, or services, other than those with which a consumer uses or directs a business to internally disclose CCPA personal information or intentionally interact with one or more third parties. “Selling” is defined as the disclosure of CCPA personal information to third parties in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration, but does not apply to such disclosures when a consumer uses or directs a business to intentionally disclose CCPA personal information or interact with one or more third parties.
We do not sell or share your CCPA personal information, including any Sensitive CCPA personal information, outside the exceptions.
We also do not sell or share, and have no actual knowledge that we have sold or shared any CCPA personal information of anyone under 16 years of age.
For more information about each category, purpose of use, and the third parties to which we disclose CCPA personal information, please see the “Categories of Personal Information We Collect”, “How is Personal Information used,” and “Do We Disclose Personal Information” sections.
Categories of Personal Information
Purpose of Collection
Categories of 3
rd
Parties to which PayPal discloses this Personal Information for Business Purpose
Identifiers
Provide Services
Communicate with you
Link an account
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services
Comply with laws
Process information about your contacts
Communicate with you
Provide receipts in connection with Zettle services
Remember your preferences
Associate information about you
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Card Networks and Payment Processors
Fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
Credit Reporting Agencies
Service providers
Other Users in accordance with account settings
Linked Accounts
Partners and Merchants
Other third parties
Buyers in connection with a business transfer
Records and Financial Information
Provide Services
Communicate with you
Link an account
Keep your account and Fastlane profile and financial information up to date
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services Personalize your experience
Provide personalized Services
Comply with Laws
Process information about your contacts
Communicate with you
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Card Networks and Payment Processors
Fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
Credit Reporting Agencies
Service Providers, other
Other Users in accordance with account settings
Linked Accounts
Partners and Merchants
Other third parties for business purposes
Buyers in connection with a business transfer
Commercial information
Provide Services
Communicate with you
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services
Comply with Laws
Remember your preferences
Associate information about you
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Partners and Merchants
Other third parties
Buyers or in connection with business transfer
Other Users if you have a business profile
Geolocation Data
Send you location-based options
Manage fraud and risk
Authorities
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Partners and Merchants
Internet or network activity
Operate and provide Services,
Communicate with you
Manage and improve Services
Market our Services
Send you locally relevant options
Comply with law
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Partners and Merchants
Authorities
Biometric
Authenticate you for certain actions related to your account, including to:
meet regulatory requirements or before you access accounts and services
recover passwords
update profile info
manage payments and payment methods
lift account limitations
initiate third-party crypto currency transfers
Service Providers
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information
Provide Services
Authenticate your access to an account or Fastlane profile
Manage and improve Services
Manage fraud and risk
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Professional or employment information
Provide Services
Manage fraud and risk
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Information about your imported contacts
Provide Services
Service Providers
Information in your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile
Provide Services
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Information you provide when you contact us
Provide Services
Authenticate your access to an account or Fastlane profile
Manage and improve Services
Manage fraud and risk
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Inferred data
Provide Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services
Display content based on your interest
Better respond to your requests or inquiries or for similar customer service issues
Verify your identity
Conduct risk assessment
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Sensitive Personal Information
Provide Services
Manage fraud and risk
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Buyers or in connection with business transfer
Characteristics of Protected Classifications
Provide our Services
Manage risk
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Authorities
Information from your device
Provide Services
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Communicate with you
Link an account
Market our Services
Personalize your experience
Comply with laws
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and uses PayPal Services for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
This Consumer Privacy Notice does not apply to Unbranded Payment Services.
Rev. November 2024
FACTS
WHAT DOES PAYPAL DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information. Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing. Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information. Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
Social Security number and account balances
Payment history or transaction history
Credit history or credit scores
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers’ personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers’ personal information; the reasons PayPal chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does PayPal share?
Can you limit this sharing?
For our everyday business purposes –
such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes –
to offer our products and services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates’ everyday business purposes –
information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates’ everyday business purposes –
information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you
Yes for PayPal accounts Only
No for all other GLBA covered products and services (including Fastlane)
Yes for PayPal accounts Only. We don’t share for all other GLBA covered products and services (including Fastlane)
Questions?
Call our customer service at 1-888-221-1161or visit us at
/smarthelp/contact-us/privacy
.
To limit our sharing
To limit our sharing
You may limit our sharing by logging into you PayPal account and editing your preferences in the Data and Privacy setting.
Please note:
If you are an existing PayPal customer who had a PayPal account before November 27, 2024, we only share personal information collected after November 27, 2024, unless you opt-out. We may share information from earlier in your account, which allows for even better personalization, if you affirmatively consent by editing your preferences in your Data and Privacy settings.
If you are a customer who opened a PayPal account after November 27, 2024, we can begin sharing information associated with your account. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
Who we are
Who is providing this Privacy
Statement
?
This privacy notice is provided by PayPal, Inc. and is applicable to your personal U.S. PayPal and Xoom accounts, and Fastlane profile.
What we do
How does PayPal protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access and use, we use security measures that comply with federal law. These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.
How does PayPal collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
open an account or provide account information
use your credit or debit card or give us your contact information
use your PayPal and/or Xoom account to send or receive funds
We also collect your personal information from others, such as credit bureaus, affiliates, or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
affiliates from using your information to market to you
sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See below for more information on your rights under state law.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
Our affiliates include Bill Me Later, Inc.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between nonaffiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
Our joint marketing partners include financial companies and banks.
Other important information
We may transfer Personal Information to other countries, for example, for customer service or to process transactions.
California:
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA) permits consumers who are California residents to ask businesses covered under the CCPA about Personal Information it has collected about the consumer, submit an access or deletion request, and opt-out of the sale of Personal Information, if applicable. These provisions do not apply to personal information collected, processed, shared, or disclosed by financial institutions pursuant to federal law such as the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act. Please see our
California, North Dakota, and Vermont Supplemental Financial Privacy Notice
for more information. Contact us if you have questions about our privacy statement, this consumer notice, or your Personal Information. If your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile has a California mailing address, we will not share Personal Information we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.
To talk about your PayPal account, call PayPal Customer Service at 1-888-221-1161 or visit our
Customer Service web portal
. To talk about your Xoom account, call Xoom Customer Service at 1-877-815-1531 or visit our
Help Center web portal
. To talk about your Fastlane profile, call PayPal Customer Service at 1-844-705-3555 or visit your
Fastlane profile management portal
.
Vermont
: If your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile has a Vermont mailing address, We will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures. Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found at
Customer Service web portal
or call 1-888-221-1161
Nevada
: If your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile has a Nevada mailing address, we are providing this notice pursuant to Nevada law. If you prefer not to receive marketing calls from PayPal, you may be placed on our internal Do Not Call List by calling 1-888-221-1161 or going to
/smarthelp/home
. For more information, you can contact PayPal at 12312 Port Grace Blvd, La Vista, NE 68128 or you can contact the Bureau of Consumer Protection, Office of the Nevada Attorney General, 555 E. Washington St., Suite 3900, Las Vegas, NV 89101; telephone number: 1-702-486-3132; email: Aginfo@ag.nv.gov
Sub-policy 1
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/orgs:
GPC signal not detected.
Please
download a browser/extension
that supports it.
Founding Organizations
Global Privacy Control has broad industry support. Below, you’ll find browsers and extensions which send the GPC signal, businesses that honor GPC and other supporting partners involved in creating the specification.
Download
Download
Download
Download
Download
Download
Download
Abine DeleteMe
LEARN MORE
Automattic
LEARN MORE
Brave Software
LEARN MORE
Check My Ads
LEARN MORE
Complianz
LEARN MORE
Consumer Reports
LEARN MORE
Didomi
LEARN MORE
Disconnect
LEARN MORE
Digital Content Next
LEARN MORE
DuckDuckGo
LEARN MORE
EFF
LEARN MORE
Financial Times
LEARN MORE
Glitch
LEARN MORE
Ketch
LEARN MORE
lockr
LEARN MORE
Meredith Digital
LEARN MORE
Mozilla
LEARN MORE
National Science Foundation
LEARN MORE
New York Times
LEARN MORE
OneTrust
LEARN MORE
Optery
LEARN MORE
privacy-tech-lab
LEARN MORE
Raptive
LEARN MORE
SourcePoint
LEARN MORE
TrustArc
LEARN MORE
Wesleyan University
LEARN MORE
Washington Post
LEARN MORE
WireWheel
LEARN MORE
Get Involved
Contact us to learn more about supporting
GPC
in your browser, app, or website.
@globalprivctrl